Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Article 4. Temporary Authority.

§ 5.1-107.
Issuance of temporary authority by Commission pending hearing on application for certificate.

To enable the provision of service for which there is an immediate and urgent need to a point or between points in Virginia, the Commission, may, pending its determination of an application for such permanent authority, in its discretion and without hearing or other proceeding, grant temporary authority for such service by common carrier by aircraft or restricted common carrier by aircraft, as the case may be. Such temporary authority shall be valid for such time as the Commission shall specify but not for more than an aggregate of 180 days, and shall create no presumption that corresponding permanent authority will be granted thereafter.

History.

1970, c. 708.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Express Companies, § 2.